Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.712, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. new text begin (a) new text end "Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" means: (1) any of the following firearms: (i) Avtomat Kalashnikov (AK-47) semiautomatic rifle type; (ii) Beretta AR-70 and BM-59 semiautomatic rifle types; (iii) Colt AR-15 semiautomatic rifle type; (iv) Daewoo Max-1 and Max-2 semiautomatic rifle types; (v) Famas MAS semiautomatic rifle type; (vi) Fabrique Nationale FN-LAR and FN-FNC semiautomatic rifle types; (vii) Galil semiautomatic rifle type; (viii) Heckler & Koch HK-91, HK-93, and HK-94 semiautomatic rifle types; (ix) Ingram MAC-10 and MAC-11 semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; (x) Intratec TEC-9 semiautomatic pistol type; (xi) Sigarms SIG 550SP and SIG 551SP semiautomatic rifle types; (xii) SKS with detachable magazine semiautomatic rifle type; (xiii) Steyr AUG semiautomatic rifle type; (xiv) Street Sweeper and Striker-12 revolving-cylinder shotgun types; (xv) USAS-12 semiautomatic shotgun type; (xvi) Uzi semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; or (xvii) Valmet M76 and M78 semiautomatic rifle types; (2) any firearm that is another model made by the same manufacturer as one of the firearms listed in clause (1), and has the same action design as one of the listed firearms, and is a redesigned, renamed, or renumbered version of one of the firearms listed in clause (1), or has a slight modification or enhancement, including but not limited to a folding or retractable stock; adjustable sight; case deflector for left-handed shooters; shorter barrel; wooden, plastic, or metal stock; larger clip size; different caliber; or a bayonet mount; and (3) any firearm that has been manufactured or sold by another company under a licensing agreement with a manufacturer of one of the firearms listed in clause (1) entered into after the effective date of Laws 1993, chapter 326, to manufacture or sell firearms that are identical or nearly identical to those listed in clause (1), or described in clause (2), regardless of the company of production or country of origin. The weapons listed in clause (1), except those listed in items (iii), (ix), (x), (xiv), and (xv), are the weapons the importation of which was barred by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of the Treasury in July 1989. deleted text begin Except as otherwise specifically provided in paragraph (d), a firearm is not a "semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" if it is generally recognized as particularly suitable for or readily adaptable to sporting purposes under United States Code, title 18, section 925, paragraph (d)(3), or any regulations adopted pursuant to that law. deleted text end new text begin (b) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon includes any: new text end new text begin (1) semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; or new text end new text begin (iv) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned. A shroud does not include a slide that encloses the barrel; new text end new text begin (2) semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (ii) a folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (iii) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned. A shroud does not include a slide that encloses the barrel; or new text end new text begin (iv) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine at any location outside of the pistol grip; new text end new text begin (3) semiautomatic shotgun that has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; new text end new text begin (iv) a fixed magazine capacity in excess of ten rounds; or new text end new text begin (v) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine; new text end new text begin (4) shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or new text end new text begin (5) conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from which an assault weapon can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person. new text end new text begin Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon does not include any firearm described in this paragraph that has been made permanently inoperable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [624.7145] SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS; CERTIFICATION REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Certification required. new text end new text begin No person may own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon unless the person has certified the weapon with the commissioner of public safety under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification application process. new text end new text begin (a) A person may certify a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon with the commissioner of public safety by providing in person to the commissioner, along with any other information the commissioner requires, a background check verification issued within the past 30 days by the chief of police of the municipality where the person resides or, if there is no chief of police, by the sheriff of the county where the person resides. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall take a color photograph of the applicant at the time the application is submitted. The commissioner may charge the applicant a processing fee in an amount not to exceed the actual and reasonable direct cost of processing the application or $......., whichever is less. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties of local police; background check. new text end new text begin (a) A person may apply for a background check verification by providing the following information in writing to the chief of police of the municipality where the person resides or, if there is no local chief of police, to the sheriff of the county where the person resides: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant's name, residence, telephone number, and driver's license number or nonqualification certificate number, if any; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's gender, date of birth, height, weight, eye color, and distinguishing physical characteristics, if any; new text end new text begin (3) a statement that the applicant authorizes the release to the local police authority of commitment information about the applicant maintained by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board to the extent that the information relates to the applicant's eligibility to possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under section 624.713, subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (4) a statement by the applicant that the applicant is not prohibited under section 624.713 or other state or federal law from possessing a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. new text end new text begin The statements in clauses (3) and (4) must be signed and dated by the applicant. The statement under clause (3) must comply with any applicable requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 2.31 to 2.35, with respect to consent to disclosure of alcohol or drug patient records. At the time of application, the chief of police or county sheriff may charge the applicant a reasonable fee to cover the cost of conducting the background check and performing the chief's or sheriff's duties under this section. The chief or sheriff shall provide the applicant with a dated receipt for the application. new text end new text begin (b) Chiefs of police and sheriffs shall make background check verification application forms available without charge. new text end new text begin (c) The chief of police or sheriff shall check criminal histories, records, and warrant information relating to the applicant through the Minnesota Crime Information System and the National Criminal Record Repository and shall make a reasonable effort to check other available state and local record-keeping systems. The chief of police or sheriff shall obtain commitment information from the Direct Care and Treatment executive board as provided in section 246C.15. new text end new text begin (d) The chief of police or sheriff may refuse to issue a background check verification: new text end new text begin (1) if state or federal law prohibits the applicant from possessing a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon; new text end new text begin (2) if the chief of police or sheriff determines the applicant to be a danger to self or the public when in possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under paragraph (e); new text end new text begin (3) if the applicant is listed in the criminal gang investigative data system under section 299C.091; or new text end new text begin (4) for any other reason as determined by the chief of police or sheriff. new text end new text begin (e) A chief of police or sheriff may refuse to grant a background check verification to an applicant if there exists a substantial likelihood that the applicant is a danger to self or the public when in possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. To deny the application under paragraph (d), clause (2), the chief of police or sheriff shall provide the applicant with written notification and the specific factual basis justifying the denial, including the source of the factual basis. The chief of police or sheriff shall inform the applicant of the applicant's right to submit, within 20 business days, any additional documentation relating to the propriety of the denial. Upon receiving any additional documentation, the chief of police or sheriff shall reconsider the denial and inform the applicant within 15 business days of the result of the reconsideration. Any denial after reconsideration must be in the same form and contain the same substance as the original denial and must specifically address any continued deficiencies in light of the additional documentation submitted by the applicant. new text end new text begin (f) A person is not eligible to submit a background check verification application under this section if the person has had an application denied pursuant to paragraph (e) and less than six months have elapsed since the denial was issued. new text end new text begin (g) The chief of police or sheriff shall issue a background check verification or deny the application within 90 days of the application's submission. new text end new text begin (h) In the case of a denial, the chief of police or sheriff shall provide an applicant with written notification of a denial and the specific reason for the denial. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility for certification. new text end new text begin No person may own, possess, or receive a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon unless it was legally owned before the effective date of this section, was certified by that owner before January 1, 2027, and was subsequently continuously certified. A semiautomatic military-style assault weapon may be certified under this section only if the weapon qualifies under this subdivision. A person seeking to certify the weapon shall demonstrate to the commissioner's satisfaction that the weapon is eligible for certification. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Grant or denial of certification. new text end new text begin (a) If the applicant meets the requirements under subdivisions 2 to 4, the commissioner of public safety shall issue a certification within five business days of the submission of the application. If the commissioner denies issuance, the commissioner shall provide the applicant with written notification of the denial and the specific reason for the denial. The commissioner may deny the application only if the semiautomatic military-style assault weapon is not eligible for certification or the applicant is not eligible to certify the semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under this section. Any person aggrieved by the denial of an application may seek review as provided in subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall conduct a background check by means of electronic data transfer on a certification holder through the Minnesota Crime Information System and the National Instant Criminal Background Check System at least annually to ensure continuing eligibility. The commissioner may also conduct additional background checks by means of electronic data transfer on a holder at any time during the period a certificate is in effect. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Certification; contents; validity. new text end new text begin (a) A certification granted under this section must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the date of issuance, the date of expiration, and a unique certification number; new text end new text begin (2) the holder's name, current address, date of birth, sex, height, weight, and eye color; and new text end new text begin (3) the color photograph of the holder that was taken at the time of the application. new text end new text begin (b) The certification is valid statewide for five years from the date of issuance and is not transferable. The certification may be renewed in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions under which the original certification was obtained. new text end new text begin (c) A certification shall be void at the time that the holder becomes prohibited from possessing or receiving a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under section 624.713, in which event the holder shall return the certification within five days to the commissioner. If the commissioner has knowledge that the holder is ineligible to possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, the commissioner shall revoke the certification and give notice to the holder in writing. Failure of the holder to return the certification within five days of learning that the certification is void or revoked is a gross misdemeanor unless the court finds that the circumstances or the physical or mental condition of the holder prevented the holder from complying with the return requirement. new text end new text begin (d) When a certification holder receives a court disposition that prohibits the holder from possessing a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, the court shall take possession of the certification, if available, and send the certification to the commissioner. If the holder does not have the certification when the court imposes a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon prohibition, the holder shall surrender the certification to the assigned probation officer, if applicable. When a probation officer is assigned upon disposition of the case, the court shall inform the probation agent of the holder's obligation to surrender the certification. Upon surrender of the certification, the probation officer shall send the certification to the commissioner. If a probation officer is not assigned to the holder, the holder shall surrender the certification as provided in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Requirement to carry certification. new text end new text begin A certification holder shall carry the certification whenever the holder possesses the semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Hearing upon denial. new text end new text begin (a) Any person aggrieved by denial of a certification may appeal by petition to the district court having jurisdiction over the county or municipality where the application was submitted. The petition must list the commissioner of public safety as the respondent. The district court shall hold a hearing at the earliest practicable date and in any event no later than 60 days following the filing of the petition for review. The court may not grant or deny any relief before the completion of the hearing. The record of the hearing must be sealed. The matter must be heard de novo without a jury. new text end new text begin (b) The court shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law regarding the issues submitted by the parties. The court shall issue its writ of mandamus directing that the certification be issued and order other appropriate relief unless the commissioner establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the weapon or applicant was not eligible for a certification under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Statewide record system. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall maintain a statewide, computerized record system containing information on semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certifications under this section. Information in the record system must be readily available on a 24-hour basis to requesting law enforcement agencies. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates this section by failing to carry a certification is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who: (1) makes a false statement in order to obtain a background check verification or certification knowing or having reason to know the statement is false or (2) transfers a verification or certification in violation of this section is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin (c) A person who owns, possesses, or receives a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon that: (1) is uncertified; (2) is ineligible for certification; or (3) has an expired certification is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 15 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $30,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Applicability of certification. new text end new text begin A certification issued under this section is valid only for the individual semiautomatic military-style assault weapon for which the certification applies. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Private data. new text end new text begin All data pertaining to certifications and background check verifications under this section are classified as private data as provided in section 13.87, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Semiautomatic military-style assault weapons owned or possessed before effective date; continued certification. new text end new text begin All persons who own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon before the effective date of this section shall comply with the certification requirements by December 31, 2026. A semiautomatic military-style assault weapon not certified by that date or that has a certification not continuously kept current is ineligible for future certification. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Rules required. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may adopt rules to implement this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) the ownership or possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by any government officer, agent, or employee; member of the National Guard or armed forces of the United States; or peace officer, to the extent that the person is otherwise authorized to own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon and does so while acting within the scope of the person's duties; new text end new text begin (2) the ownership, possession, or manufacture of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a firearms manufacturer, provided the manufacturer is properly licensed under applicable laws; new text end new text begin (3) the ownership or possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a firearms dealer, provided the dealer is properly licensed under applicable laws; new text end new text begin (4) the temporary possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a person who has received the weapon to repair, recondition, or remodel the weapon; new text end new text begin (5) the temporary possession of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a prospective transferee while in the presence of the owner; or new text end new text begin (6) the temporary possession for up to 60 days of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by an immediate family member of the certification holder following the holder's death pending the certification or lawful disposition of the weapon provided the person is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing the weapon. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [624.7146] TRANSFER OF SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Approval required. new text end new text begin A person may not transfer a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon to another person unless the transfer is approved in advance by the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Process for approval. new text end new text begin (a) A person seeking to transfer a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon to another person shall apply to the commissioner of public safety for approval on a form designed and made readily available without cost by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall approve the transfer if: new text end new text begin (1) the transferor possesses a current certification for the weapon as required in section 624.7145; new text end new text begin (2) the transferee submits a background check verification as described in section 624.7145; and new text end new text begin (3) the transferee pays a fee determined by the commissioner in an amount not to exceed the actual and reasonable direct cost of processing the application or $......., whichever is less. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall approve a transfer under paragraph (b) within seven days of the request. The commissioner may deny the request only if the requirements described in paragraph (b) are not met. If the commissioner denies the request, the commissioner shall provide the reasons for the denial. A person aggrieved by a denial may seek review as provided in sections 14.57 to 14.69. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Rules required. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may adopt rules to implement this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section shall not apply to transfers of antique firearms as curiosities or for their historical significance or value, transfers to or between federally licensed firearms dealers, transfers by order of court, involuntary transfers, transfers at death, or the following temporary transfers: new text end new text begin (1) a loan to a prospective transferee while in the presence of the transferor; new text end new text begin (2) a delivery to a person for the purpose of repair, reconditioning, or remodeling; new text end new text begin (3) a loan between peace officers, members of the National Guard, or members of the armed forces of the United States, to the extent that the person is otherwise authorized to own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon and does so within the scope of the person's duties; or new text end new text begin (4) a delivery to a law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 15 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $30,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Record system. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall maintain a statewide computerized record system containing information on semiautomatic military-style assault weapon transfers approved under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Data. new text end new text begin All data collected pursuant to this section are classified as private data. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [624.7147] REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Chiefs of police and sheriffs. new text end new text begin By January 15 each year, each chief of police and sheriff shall report to the commissioner of public safety on the number of background check verification applications received in the preceding calendar year under section 624.7145 and the disposition of those applications, including the reason for each denial. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin By March 15 each year, the commissioner of public safety shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over firearms. The report must include a summary of the reports required under subdivision 1. In addition, the report must include a summary similar to that described in subdivision 1 of semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certifications under section 624.7145 and semiautomatic military-style assault weapon transfers under section 624.7146, along with any other related information the commissioner deems relevant. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7151, is amended to read: 624.7151 STANDARDIZED FORMS. deleted text begin By December 1, 1992,deleted text end The commissioner shall adopt statewide standards governing the form and contents, as required deleted text begin bydeleted text end new text begin undernew text end sections 624.7131 to 624.714new text begin and 624.7145new text end , of every application for a pistol transferee permit, pistol transferee permit, report of transfer of a pistol, application for a permit to carry a pistol, deleted text begin anddeleted text end permit to carry a pistolnew text begin , application for a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certification, and semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certificationnew text end that is granted or renewed deleted text begin on or after January 1, 1993deleted text end . Every application for a pistol transferee permit, pistol transferee permit, report of transfer of a pistol, application for a permit to carry a pistol, deleted text begin anddeleted text end permit to carry a pistolnew text begin , application for a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certification, and semiautomatic military-style assault weapon certificationnew text end that is received, granted, or renewed by a police chief or county sheriff deleted text begin on or after January 1, 1993,deleted text end must meet the statewide standards adopted by the commissioner. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, neither failure of the Department of Public Safety to adopt standards nor failure of the police chief or county sheriff to meet them shall delay the timely processing of applications nor invalidate permits new text begin or certifications new text end issued on other forms meeting the requirements of sections 624.7131 to 624.714new text begin and 624.7145new text end . Any form used for the purpose of approving or disapproving a person from purchasing, owning, possessing, or carrying a firearm that inquires about the applicant's use of controlled substances shall specifically authorize a patient in the registry program to refrain from reporting the use of medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products and shall specifically authorize a person 21 years of age or older from refraining from reporting the use of adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPLICATION.new text end new text begin A person who legally owns or possesses a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon on the date of enactment of section 2 has until December 31, 2026, to certify the weapon without penalty under section 2. new text end